Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1280.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of September 27, 1961 (P.L.1700, No.699), known as the Pharmacy Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 3.5. Medication Error Prevention Training.--(a) The board shall develop a medication error prevention training program for licensed pharmacists, pharmacy technicians and pharmacy technician trainees.(b) The medication error prevention training program established under subsection (a) shall:(1) Be conducted by a board-approved instructor.(2) Utilize a board-approved written curriculum and examination.1234567891011121314151617181920 (3) Cover the following topics:(i) The role, responsibilities and performance of the prescribing physician in the medication administration process.(ii) The rights of the individual regarding accepting or refusing medications.(iii) Categories of medications , including effects associated with each category . (iv) Effective management of poisoning or medication overdose.(v) Storage and disposal of medications.(vi) Communications with individuals or guardians, if applicable, about the individual's medications.(vii) The six principles of medication administration, including:(A) The correct medication.(B) The correct dosage of the medication.(C) The medication to the correct individual.(D) The medication at the correct time.(E) The medication to the individual by the correct method.(F) The accurate documentation.(4) Include a medication error prevention examination that requires the demonstration of the requisite knowledge and skills of medication error prevention.(c) An instructor shall issue a certification for the completion of the training program established under subsection (a) to an individual if the individual:(1) Successfully completes the medication error prevention training program.(2) Scores 80% or higher on the examination under subsection (b)(4).20250HB1280PN1452 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Demonstrates knowledge of the following pertaining to administering medications:(i) The name of the medication.(ii) The reason for the medication's use.(iii) Any side effects or adverse reactions.(iv) Any special instructions for the medication such as giving certain fluids, checking pulse rate or monitoring blood levels.(d) Each pharmacist, pharmacy technician and pharmacy technician trainee shall take part in the medication error prevention training annually.(e) A pharmacist who has been licensed in this Commonwealth for less than five years must obtain a certificate of completion in accordance with subsection (c) twice each year until the pharmacist has been licensed in this Commonwealth for a total of five years.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1280PN1452 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617